Idaho, session 2026, S1392.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1143, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1143. RIGHT TO RELY -- DEFINITIVE IDENTIFICATION. (1) Any person
signing a funeral service agreement or cremation authorization form or any
other authorization for disposition, whether part of a prearranged funeral
plan or at time of death, shall be deemed to warrant the truthfulness of any
facts set forth therein, including the identity of the deceased whose re-
mains are sought to be buried or cremated and the signer's authority to order
such disposition.
(2) A funeral establishment, cemetery, or crematory establishment
shall have the right to rely on such authorization and shall have authority
to dispose of human remains upon the receipt of an authorization form signed
by the decedent or by the person having the right to control disposition as
set forth in section 54-1142, Idaho Code, or upon authorization by the county
coroner pursuant to section 31-2802, Idaho Code, as long as such funeral
establishment, cemetery, or crematory establishment also complies with the
provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section. There shall be no lia-
bility of a funeral establishment, cemetery or crematory establishment that
disposes of human remains pursuant to such authorization, or that releases
or disposes of the remains pursuant to such authorization.
(3) Prior to making an application for cremation, a funeral establish-
ment, cemetery, or crematory establishment shall verify that a definitive
identification of the decedent has been made by an attending physician,
physician assistant, advanced practice professional nurse, or the county
coroner pursuant to the provisions of section 39-260, Idaho Code.
(4) Prior to performing a cremation, a funeral establishment, ceme-
tery, or crematory establishment shall verify that the decedent to be
cremated is the same individual who was definitively identified as provided
for in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "definitive identification"
means to verify an individual's identity definitively or with high confi-
dence through a method such as fingerprinting, DNA analysis, government-is-
sued photographic identification, or a visual identification by a legal next
of kin to confirm that an individual is accurately identified.


(6) There shall be no liability for a funeral establishment, cemetery,
or crematory establishment that disposes of human remains in compliance with
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.